Virginia statutes. Title 14.1. Costs, Fees, Salaries and Allowances.
§§ 14.1-1 through 14.1-201.

Repealed by Acts 1998, c. 872, effective October 1, 1998.

Cross references.

Present provisions relating to costs, fees, salaries, and allowances are now located throughout the Code of Virginia. For location of the comparable new sections, consult the comparable table in Volume 10. For provisions relating to Acts 1998, c. 872, and the recodification of Title 17.1 and repeal of Title 14 of the Code of Virginia, see Editor’s note at §

17.1-100

.